Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 14.45.150.
Interscholastic activities; eligibility.

A full-time student who is eligible under (b) of this section who is enrolled in grades nine through 12 in an alternative education program that is located in the state and that does not offer interscholastic activities is eligible to participate in any interscholastic activities program available in a religious or other private school regulated under this chapter

that the student would be eligible to attend were the student not enrolled in an alternative education program; and

at which the student requests to participate, if the administrator of the school approves.

A student is eligible to participate in interscholastic activities under this section if the student

is otherwise eligible to participate in interscholastic activities under requirements established by the school and the statewide interscholastic activities governing body;

provides documentation, including academic transcripts, proof of full-time enrollment, and applicable disciplinary records, and, if required for participation in an activity by the school, requested medical records, to the school providing the interscholastic activities program; and

claims the same school for interscholastic activities eligibility purposes during a school year.

In this section,

“alternative education program” means a public secondary school that provides a nontraditional education program, including the Alaska Military Youth Academy; a public vocational, remedial, or theme-based program; a home school program that is accredited by a recognized accrediting body; a charter school authorized under AS

14.03.250

-

14.03.290

; and a statewide correspondence school that enrolls students who reside outside of a district in which the student resides and provides less than three hours a week of scheduled face-to-face student interactions in the same location with a teacher who is certified under AS

14.20.020

;

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“full-time student” means a student who

is enrolled in not less than five classes in grades nine through 11 and not less than four classes in grade 12; and

is on track to graduate from secondary school in not more than four years of attendance in secondary school;

“interscholastic activities” means preparation for and participation in events or competitions involving another school when the preparation or participation

is sanctioned or supported by the statewide interscholastic activities governing body;

is conducted outside of the regular school curriculum; and

does not involve participation in student government at a school;

“located in the state” means that the alternative education program is accessed by a student who is located in the state and provides for all instructional hours to take place at a site in the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 62 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 62, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Sec. 14.45.190.
School lockers.

A private school may search school lockers and other containers as provided in AS

14.03.105

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 33 SLA 1995)

Sec. 14.45.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“private school” means a school that does not receive direct state or federal funding;

“religious school” means a private school operated by a church or other religious organization that does not receive direct state or federal funding.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 14.45.140. Renumbered in 1984.